Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal and State Firefighter’s School

§ 45-11-1.
Commissioner of Insurance as State Fire Marshal; appointment of State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal; qualifications, powers and duties; records of fires investigated; appointment of State Chief Assistant Deputy Fire Marshal.

The Commissioner of Insurance is by virtue of his office the State Fire Marshal and shall appoint the State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal who, along with his employees, shall be designated as a division of the Insurance Department. The State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal shall be a person qualified by experience and training and thoroughly knowledgeable in the areas of arson investigation and prevention, fire prevention, fire fighting and the training of firemen. The State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal shall serve at the will and pleasure of the Commissioner of Insurance.

The State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal shall employ such deputy state fire marshals as are necessary and in accordance with availability of funds. Deputy fire marshals shall be deployed across the state in order to provide effective service to fire scenes.

It shall be the duty of the State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal to investigate, by himself or his deputy, the origin of every fire occurring within the state to which his attention is called by the chief of the fire department or other law enforcement authority of any county or municipality. It shall also be his duty to investigate any case requested by any party in interest, whenever, in his judgment, there be sufficient evidence or circumstances indicating that such fire may be of incendiary origin. All county and municipal law enforcement authorities shall cooperate with the State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal in such investigation. This section shall not be construed to impair the duty and power of county and municipal law enforcement authorities to investigate any fire occurring within his or their jurisdiction.

The State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal and deputy state fire marshals shall have the following powers:

To arrest without warrant any person or persons committing or attempting to commit any misdemeanor or felony within their presence or view but only such violations of law or violations of regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 49, Title 75, Mississippi Code of 1972;

To pursue and so arrest any person committing an offense as described under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph to and at any place in the State of Mississippi where he may go or be;

To execute all warrants and search warrants related to, and investigate any violation of the laws and regulations related to this chapter and Chapter 49, Title 75, Mississippi Code of 1972, and prevent, arrest and apprehend such violators; and

To aid and assist any peace officer of this state or any other state if requested, or in manhunts or natural disasters within the state, and upon the consent of the State Fire Marshal, within the jurisdiction of the called event.

Nothing herein shall be construed as granting the State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal or deputy state fire marshals general police powers.

All deputy state fire marshals hired on or after July 1, 2013, shall be required to complete or have completed the Law Enforcement Officers Training Program and shall meet the standards of the program.

The State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal shall maintain in his office a record of all fires investigated by him or his deputy, including evidence obtained as to the origin of each such fire.

Such record shall at all times be subject to inspection by any party of interest in the fire loss; provided, however, that no record or report of an investigation shall be subject to inspection pending such investigation or while same is in progress, and if a report of an investigation contains any evidence of arson or other felony, same shall not be subject to inspection by any person other than the district attorney and county attorney of the county in which such evidence indicates that arson or other felony may have been committed, except upon the written approval of such district attorney or the order of a court of competent jurisdiction. Provided that in cases where a person has been arrested for the crimes of arson, attempted arson, or any other felony, the defendant or his attorney shall have access to these records. Any physical evidence of arson or other felony shall be delivered to the custody of the sheriff of the county wherein such fire occurred.

The State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal may appoint, with the consent of the Commissioner of Insurance, a State Chief Assistant Deputy Fire Marshal, who shall have power, during the chief deputy’s absence or inability to act due to any cause, to perform any and all of the duties of the chief deputy. The chief assistant deputy shall serve at the will and pleasure of the Commissioner of Insurance.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 2660; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5126; 1930, § 5189; 1942, § 5699; Laws, 1964, ch. 421, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 584, § 2; Laws, 1992, ch. 328, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 381, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 360, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 45-11-2.
Establishment and maintenance of registry of fire damages; provision of information by insurance companies and public agencies; promulgation of rules.

The State Fire Marshall shall establish a registry of fire damage in all instances of fires causing Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) or more in property damage or in which any person is injured or loses his life.

The registry so established shall be compiled and maintained in a manner whereby data may be retrieved by subject categories, including, but not limited to, the following:

Geographic location;

Damages in monetary terms;

Insurer;

Insured; and

Tenant or resident.

All insurance companies doing business in this state and all public agencies shall supply such information as may be demanded by the State Fire Marshall with respect to this section.

The State Fire Marshall shall promulgate all rules necessary for the implementation of this section in accordance with the Administrative Procedures Act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 489, § 1, eff from and after Jan 1, 1992.

§ 45-11-3.
Proceedings in regard to dangerous or hazardous inflammable condition existing in building; funding of agency expenses; deposit of monies into State General Fund.

Whenever the State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal, or his authorized representative, shall be advised by interested persons of a dangerous or hazardous inflammable condition existing in any building that would tend to impair the safety of persons or property, he shall take proper proceedings, including furnishing of all information in regard thereto to the Attorney General who shall, if he finds such evidence sufficient, bring injunctive proceedings to have the condition corrected. Provided that this section may not apply in any instance where local fire departments or other local agencies have the authority to correct such conditions.

From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law.

From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 2663; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5129; 1930, § 5192; 1942, § 5702; Laws, 1964, ch. 421, § 3; Laws, 1988, ch. 584, § 3; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 45-11-5.
Tax on gross premium receipts of fire insurance policies to defray expenses of office of state chief deputy fire marshal and state fire academy; additional funding for municipal fire protection fund and county volunteer fire department fund; defrayal of agency expenses by appropriation from General Fund; deposit of monies into State General Fund.

Any expense, including office supplies, counsel fees, expenses of deputy, detective and officers, incurred by the Commissioner of Insurance in the performance of the duties imposed upon him by Sections 45-11-1 and 45-11-3, and the operation of the State Fire Academy, as provided in Section 45-11-7, shall be defrayed by all insurance companies, including stock, mutuals and reciprocals writing fire insurance, including the fire insurance components of automobile insurance, dwelling multiple peril insurance, farm multiple peril insurance and commercial multiple peril insurance, doing business in this state; and a tax of one-half of one percent (1/2 of 1%) of the gross premium receipts of these fire insurance policies is hereby levied for this purpose to be collected by the State Tax Commission in the same manner as the general tax on premiums is collected as provided in Section 25-15-107. In the case of indivisible multiple peril insurance policies when the fire portion of the policy is not specified, a tax of one-half of one percent (1/2 of 1%) is hereby levied on forty-five percent (45%) of the gross premium receipts of these policies.

There is created a separate account known as the “State Fire Academy Fund” for support of the State Fire Academy. Not later than the fifteenth of the month succeeding the month in which taxes under subsection (1) are collected, the State Treasurer shall transfer into this account all taxes collected under subsection (1) for the operation of the State Fire Academy. The annual expenditure for the operation of the academy shall not exceed the amount in the account; however, any unexpended funds remaining in the account at the close of the fiscal year may be carried over for use in the ensuing years.

A tax of one-half of one percent (1/2 of 1%) is hereby levied on the gross premium receipts of all insurance policies taxed in subsection (1).

Not later than the fifteenth day of each month, the State Treasurer shall disburse the revenue from the tax levied in this subsection as follows:

Fifty percent (50%) shall be transferred into the Municipal Fire Protection Fund in Section 83-1-37; and

Fifty percent (50%) shall be transferred to the County Volunteer Fire Department Fund in Section 83-1-39.

All taxes shall be deposited into the Treasury as provided in Section 7-7-21. The tax commission shall keep separate accounts of all taxes collected under this section and shall include these accounts in its annual report.

From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law.

From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 2665; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5131; 1930, § 5194; 1942, § 5704; Laws, 1932, ch. 244; Laws, 1934, ch. 298; Laws, 1938, ch. 197; Laws, 1950, ch. 411; Laws, 1962, ch. 463, § 1; Laws, 1964, ch. 471, § 4; Laws, 1966, ch. 531, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 442 § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 354; Laws, 1982, ch. 351, § 8; Laws, 1984, ch. 478, § 29; Laws, 1985, ch. 538, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 584, § 4; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 62, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 502, § 3; Laws, 1994, ch. 577, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 45-11-7.
State fire academy; executive director; division of fire services development; defrayal of agency expenses by appropriation from General Fund; deposit of monies into State General Fund.

There is hereby created a State Fire Academy for the training and education of persons engaged in municipal, county and industrial fire protection. The Commissioner of Insurance shall appoint an Executive Director of the State Fire Academy who, along with his employees, shall be designated as a division of the Insurance Department. The executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the Commissioner of Insurance. The State Fire Academy shall be under the supervision and direction of the Executive Director of the State Fire Academy. State Fire Academy training programs for fire personnel shall be conducted at the academy with seminars to be conducted in other sections of the state as and when the State Fire Academy Advisory Board considers it necessary and advisable.

The Commissioner of Insurance may establish and charge reasonable fees for the training programs and other services provided by the academy. A record of all funds received pursuant to this paragraph shall be maintained as is required for other monies pursuant to Section 45-11-5.

The Executive Director of the State Fire Academy is authorized and empowered to purchase, operate and maintain mobile firefighting equipment as he may find necessary and proper for the operation of the academy subject to approval of the Commissioner of Insurance. The equipment may be utilized wherever training sessions may be held at the discretion of the State Fire Academy Advisory Board.

The Commissioner of Insurance shall be authorized to undertake appropriate action to accomplish and fulfill the purposes of the State Fire Academy, including the hiring of instructors and personnel, the lease and purchase of appropriate training equipment and to lease, purchase or construct suitable premises and quarters for conducting annual school and seminars, as the State Fire Academy Advisory Board may deem necessary and required for such purposes. Any contract entered into under and by virtue of the provisions of this section shall first be submitted to and approved by the Public Procurement Review Board, and construction pursuant to the contract shall be under the supervision of the Governor’s Office of General Services.

Vouchers for operating expense for the State Fire Academy shall be signed by the Executive Director of the State Fire Academy and payment thereof shall be made from such funds to be derived from a special allocation from the State Fire Academy Fund as provided in Section 45-11-5.

The State Fire Academy is hereby officially designated as the agency of this state to conduct training for fire personnel on a statewide basis in which members of all duly constituted fire departments may participate. This subsection shall not be construed to affect the authority of any fire department to conduct training for its own personnel.

Each state agency, private agency or federal agency which provides training for the fire service shall coordinate such efforts with the State Fire Academy to prevent duplication of cost and to insure standardization of training.

The State Fire Academy shall present an appropriate certificate signifying the successful completion of its prescribed courses.

National firefighter standards approved by the Mississippi Fire Personnel Minimum Standards and Certification Board shall be used as the basis for classroom instruction at the fire academy.

The Commissioner of Insurance, Executive Director of the State Fire Academy, and the Mississippi Fire Personnel Minimum Standards and Certification Board shall coordinate all state programs related to fire department operations.

The Commissioner of Insurance is hereby authorized and empowered to establish standard guidelines for the use of, and accountability for, municipal and county fire protection funds distributed pursuant to the provisions of Sections 83-1-37 and 83-1-39, Mississippi Code of 1972. Such guidelines shall include requirements for the establishment of record keeping and reports to the Commissioner of Insurance by municipalities and counties relating to the receipt and expenditure of fire protection funds, the training of fire department personnel and the submission to the Commissioner of Insurance of other data reasonably related to local fire protection responsibilities which the Commissioner of Insurance deems necessary for the performance of the duties of the State Fire Academy Advisory Board.

In order that the Commissioner of Insurance may more effectively execute the duties imposed upon him by subsection (9) of this section, there is hereby created within the State Fire Academy a Division of Fire Services Development. The division shall be staffed by a Fire Services Development Coordinator, appointed by the executive director of the academy from his current staff and by such other personnel as deemed by the Commissioner of Insurance. The division shall work with municipal and county fire coordinators to ensure effective implementation of guidelines established pursuant to subsection (9) of this section and shall serve in an advisory capacity for all aspects of fire service improvement. The Fire Service Coordinator shall annually notify the Department of Finance and Administration of those municipalities and counties which are not eligible to receive a portion of fire protection fund distributions because of failure to comply with requirements imposed in Sections 83-1-37 and 83-1-39 as a prerequisite to receipt of such funds.

There is created in the State Treasury a separate account to be known as the “State Fire Academy Construction Fund.” The State Treasurer shall transfer on July 1, 1997, the sum of Six Hundred Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($675,000.00) and on July 1, 1998, the sum of Six Hundred Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($675,000.00) from the State Fire Academy Fund 3502 into the separate account created in this subsection. Monies in such account shall be expended solely, upon legislative appropriations, to defray expenses related to the construction of capital improvements project known as “Fire Safety and Education Building” and parking areas at the State Fire Academy by the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management of the Office of General Services and to pay any indebtedness incurred to accomplish such construction. Funds not used after the completion of this capital improvements project shall be transferred back into State Fund 3502.

From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law.

From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5704.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 541, §§ 1-6; Laws, 1966, ch. 531, § 2; Laws, 1971, ch. 441, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 413, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 380; Laws, 1980, ch. 327; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 214; Laws, 1985, ch. 538, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 584, § 5; Laws, 1992, ch. 529, § 3; Laws, 1997, ch. 559, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 45-11-8.
State Fire Academy Advisory Board.

There is hereby created the State Fire Academy Advisory Board for the purpose of reviewing matters affecting the State Fire Academy and advising the State Fire Academy on any such matters. The advisory board shall consist of the State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal, the Manager of the Mississippi State Rating Bureau, the President of the State Firefighter’s Association, the President of the Mississippi Fire Chiefs Association, the President of the Mississippi Municipal Association and the President of the Mississippi Association of Supervisors or his designee. Members of the State Fire Academy Advisory Board who are not state employees shall be entitled to a per diem compensation as provided in Section 25-3-69, Mississippi Code of 1972, and to travel expenses as provided in Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 584, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 45-11-9.
Fire Safety Education Division created; Commissioner of Insurance to administer; development of fire safety education program; rules and regulations.

There is created a Fire Safety Education Division within the State Fire Marshal’s Office of the Department of Insurance. The Commissioner of Insurance, acting through the State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal, is charged with the administration of this section.

The Fire Safety Education Division, in an effort to reduce loss of life and property from fires, shall develop and implement a fire safety education program using nationally recognized standards.

The Commissioner of Insurance, acting through the State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal, is authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations as necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 376, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2004.